Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.275

Employee benefits—Contracts or agreements—Submission of information to the health care authority.

(1) Any contract or agreement for employee benefits executed after April 13, 1990, between a school district or educational service district and a benefit provider or employee bargaining unit is null and void unless it contains an agreement to abide by state laws relating to school district and educational service district employee benefits. The term of the contract or agreement may not exceed one year, except that the final contract or agreement entered into for the 2018-19 school year must exceed one year only by the months necessary to ensure employee benefits are maintained through December 31, 2019.

(2) School districts, educational service districts, and their benefit providers shall submit data to the health care authority in accordance with RCW 41.05.075(3).

(3) Any benefit provider offering a benefit plan by contract or agreement with a school district or educational service district under subsection (1) of this section shall make available to the school district or educational service district the benefit plan descriptions and, where available, the demographic information on plan subscribers that the school district, educational service district, and benefit provider are required to report to the health care authority under this section.

(4) Each school district and educational service district shall:

(a) Carry out all actions required by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority under chapter 41.05 RCW including, but not limited to, those necessary for the operation of benefit plans, education of employees, claims administration, and appeals process; and

(b) Report all data relating to employees eligible to participate in benefits or plans administered by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority in a format designed and communicated by the school employees' benefits board and the health care authority.

[ 2018 c 260 s 22. Prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 814; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 7 s 1; 2012 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 4; 1990 1st ex.s. c 11 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 260 ss 14, 22, 23, 31, and 32: See note following RCW 41.05.075.

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Findings—Goals—Intent—2012 2nd sp.s. c 3: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Each year, nearly one billion dollars in public funds are spent on the purchase of employee insurance benefits for more than two hundred thousand public school employees and their dependents;

(b) The legislature and school districts and their employees need better information to improve current practices and inform future decisions with regard to health insurance benefits;

(c) Recent work by the state auditor's office and the state health care authority have advanced discussions throughout the state on opportunities to improve the current system; and

(d) Two major themes have emerged: (i) The state, school districts, and employees need better information and data to make better health insurance purchasing decisions within the K-12 system; (ii) affordability is a significant concern for all employees, especially for employees seeking full family insurance coverage and for the lowest-paid and part-time employees.

(2) The legislature establishes the following goals:

(a) Improve the transparency of health benefit plan claims and financial data to assure prudent and efficient use of taxpayers' funds at the state and local levels;

(b) Create greater affordability for full family coverage and greater equity between premium costs for full family coverage and for employee only coverage for the same health benefit plan;

(c) Promote health care innovations and cost savings, and significantly reduce administrative costs; and

(d) Provide greater parity in state allocations for state employee and K-12 employee health benefits.

(3) The legislature intends to retain current collective bargaining for benefits, and retain state, school district, and employee contributions to benefits." [ 2012 2nd sp.s. c 3 s 1.]

Intent—1990 1st ex.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28A.400.200.